California statutes. Education Code
The special proceeding may also be commenced to determine all questions of law and fact affecting the due and voluntary execution and delivery, and the validity and legal effect, of any gift or grant made in general terms for the benefit of the institution, or of any department of the institution, or of any gift or grant made in general terms for the benefit of the institution, or of any department of the institution, or of any gift or grant made in general terms for the benefit of the institution, or of any department of the institution, upon the trusts provided for in the grant founding the institution, and amendments thereof and grants, bequests, and devises supplementary thereto.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21182.

The special proceeding may also be commenced to determine all questions bearing upon the passing to the trustee or trustees of the legal title to the properties, real and personal, conveyed or attempted to be conveyed, so far as the property or the proceeds thereof, or any property acquired in exchange therefor or with proceeds thereof, is described in the petition provided for in this article, and the interest or title of the trustee or trustees in or to any property described in the petition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21183.

The special proceeding may also be commenced to determine all questions of law and fact affecting the due and voluntary execution and delivery, and the validity and legal effect, of any grant or surrender by any founder, surviving founder, or spouse or surviving spouse of any founder, to, or in favor of, the trustee or trustees, of any rights, powers, privileges, or duties reserved to or vesting in any such person over or concerning any property described in the petition, or over or concerning the institution, which would otherwise vest in or devolve upon the trustee or trustees upon the death of the person granting or surrendering the right, powers, privileges, or duties, and of any relinquishment or release by the founder, surviving founder, or spouse or surviving spouse of any founder, of any other rights, powers, privileges, or duties reserved to or vesting in any such person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

21184.

The trustee or trustees of any trust created pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 21100) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 21140) of this chapter, in the name of the institution or institutions, or in the name of the trustee or trustees of the institution, or in the name of the board of trustees of the institution, may file, in the superior court of the county in which the lands described in the founding grant, or some portion thereof, are situated, or, if no real estate has been granted to the trustees, then in the county where the main part of the institution is situated, a petition in writing, signed by counsel for the trustee or trustees, or by counsel for a majority thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21185.

The petition shall contain copies of all grants, amendments, attempted amendments, supplemental grants, instruments of gift, confirmatory conveyances, and grants and instruments of surrender, relinquishment or release, so far as known to the trustee or trustees.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21186.

The petition shall allege in general terms the due and voluntary execution and delivery, and the validity, of any and all instruments, copies of which are set out in the petition, and shall describe all property, real and personal, the legal title to which is held or claimed to be held by the trustee or trustees under or by virtue of any or all of the instruments, whether or not the property is the original property conveyed, the proceeds thereof, or reinvested proceeds.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21187.

The petition shall allege in general terms the estate or interest which the trustee or trustees have or claim in or to the property described.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21188.

The petition shall pray, in effect, that the court:

(a) Examine and determine all questions of law and fact affecting the due and voluntary execution and delivery, and the terms, validity, and legal effect of all the instruments, copies of which are set out in the petition.

(b) Examine and determine all questions bearing upon the passing to the trustee or trustees, of the legal title to all the properties, real and personal, conveyed or attempted to be conveyed, so far as the property or the proceeds thereof, or any property acquired in exchange therefor or with the proceeds thereof, is described in the petition.

(c) Examine and determine the interest or title of the trustee or trustees in or to the property.

(d) Establish and determine that the trustee or trustees are rightfully vested with the legal title thereto.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21189.

The court or judge shall fix the time for hearing the petition, and shall order the clerk of the court to post in at least three public places in the county a notice of the filing of the petition, attached to a copy of the petition, and order a copy of the notice together with a copy of the petition to be personally served upon the founder, if living, and upon the spouse or surviving spouse of any founder, and upon any living grantor or donor of any other grant or gift set out in the petition, and may order such other or further notice to be given as the judge or court may deem proper. The notice shall be posted and served at least 10 days before the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 242.)
-------------------------------------------

21190.

If the court or judge finds upon the hearing that due and proper notice has not been given as provided in Section 21189, it shall reset the hearing and cause due and proper notice to be given.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21191.

The notice and petition shall be entitled substantially in the following form:

In the Superior Court of the ____ County of ____, State of California.

In the matter of the petition of ____ (giving the name or names in which the petition is brought) for the ascertainment of the existence and terms of, and for the determination of the validity and legal effect of grants or other instruments creating, changing, or affecting trusts and estates for the founding, endowment, and maintenance of ____ (naming the institution or institutions founded).

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21192.

The notice shall state the time and place fixed for the hearing of the petition and shall be addressed to the founder or founders, if living, and to the spouse or surviving spouse of any deceased founder, and the living grantor or donor of any other grant or gift set out in the petition, and in general terms to all other persons having or claiming any interest in, or rights, powers, or duties over or concerning the property described in the petition; and shall direct that they and each of them appear and answer the petition on or before the time set for the hearing. The notice shall also state that unless they so appear and demur or answer, the petitioners will apply to the court to grant the prayer of the petition, and that each person failing to so appear and answer, shall be deemed to admit as true all the material allegations of the petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

21193.

Any person required to be served, or any other person interested may waive notice by written waiver filed with the clerk of the court.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21194.

Any person interested in the determination of any of the questions presented by the petition may demur to or answer the petition and may set up any new matter affecting the determination of the questions.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21195.

Any allegation of the petition or answer may be made upon information and belief.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21196.

The provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure respecting the demurrer and the answer to a verified complaint, shall be applicable to a demurrer or answer to the petition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21197.

The persons demurring to or answering the petition shall be the defendants to the special proceeding and the petitioners shall be the plaintiffs.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21198.

Every material statement of the petition not specifically controverted by the answer shall, for the purposes of the special proceeding, be taken as true, and each person failing to answer the petition shall be deemed to admit as true all the material allegations of the petition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21199.

The rules of pleading and practice provided for by the Code of Civil Procedure, which are not inconsistent with this article, are applicable to the special proceeding provided for.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21200.

Upon the hearing of the special proceeding, the court shall examine into and determine all questions of law and fact within the scope of the proceeding herein provided for, whether presented by the petition or answer, or by the proofs upon the hearing.

The court shall find and determine whether the notice of the filing of the petition has been duly given for the time and in the manner prescribed in this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21201.

The costs of the special proceeding may be allowed and apportioned between all parties, in the discretion of the court.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21202.

A certified copy of the judgment of the court in the special proceeding shall be recorded in the office of the recorder of the county in which the action is brought and in the office of the recorder of every county in which any of the real property affected is situated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

21203.

The judgment of the court in the special proceeding is determinative of the terms and trusts upon which any property thereafter given for the benefit of the institution, or any department thereof, is held by the trustee or trustees, unless otherwise provided by the grantor or donor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 13. STATE TEACHERS' RETIREMENT SYSTEM [22000. - 25115.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [22000. - 22011.]

22000.

This part may be known and cited as the E. Richard Barnes Act and together with Part 14 (commencing with Section 26000) shall be known as the Teachers’ Retirement Law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 939, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

22001.

In order to provide a financially sound plan for the retirement, with adequate retirement allowances, of teachers in the public schools of this state, teachers in schools supported by this state, and other persons employed in connection with the schools, the State Teachers’ Retirement System is established. The system is a unit of the Government Operations Agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 68.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

22001.5.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that on July 1, 1996, the State Teachers’ Retirement System Cash Balance Plan was created and established to provide a retirement plan for persons employed by an employer offering the Cash Balance Plan, excluding community college districts, to perform creditable service for less than 50 percent of the full-time equivalent for the position or employed by a community college district offering the Cash Balance Plan to perform creditable service on a temporary basis pursuant to Section 87474, 87478, 87480, 87481, 87482, or 87482.5, or employed by an employer offering the Cash Balance Plan to perform creditable service as a substitute employee. The persons eligible for the Cash Balance Plan were excluded from mandatory membership in the State Teachers’ Retirement System
 Defined Benefit Plan. Both plans are administered by the Teachers’ Retirement Board. Prior to the creation and establishment of the Cash Balance Plan, the State Teachers’ Retirement System Defined Benefit Plan had been identified simply as the State Teachers’ Retirement System. As a result, the system was identified as both the administrative body and the retirement plan. The State Teachers’ Retirement Law was amended to identify the retirement plan as the State Teachers’ Retirement System Defined Benefit Plan in order to distinguish that plan from the Cash Balance Plan. Because both plans were intended to provide for the retirement of teachers and other persons employed in connection with public schools of this state and schools supported by this state, a merger of these two plans is now hereby made for the purpose of establishing a single retirement plan that shall be known and may be cited as the State Teachers’ Retirement Plan consisting of the different benefit programs set forth in this part and Part
 14 (commencing with Section 26000). This plan shall be administered by the Teachers’ Retirement Board as set forth in this part and Part 14 (commencing with Section 26000). This part, together with Part 14 (commencing with Section 26000) shall be known and may be cited as the Teachers’ Retirement Law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 123, Sec. 1.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

22002.

The Legislature recognizes that the assets of the State Teachers’ Retirement Plan with respect to the Defined Benefit Program are insufficient to meet the obligations of that program already accrued or to accrue in the future with respect to service credited to members of that program prior to July 1, 1972. Therefore, the Legislature declares the following policies with respect to the financing of the Defined Benefit Program of the State Teachers’ Retirement Plan:

(a) Members shall contribute a percentage of creditable compensation, unless otherwise specified in this part.

(b) Employers shall contribute a percentage of the total creditable compensation on which member contributions are based.

(c) The state shall contribute a sum certain for a given number of years for the purpose of payment of benefits under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22002.5.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The current and projected assets of the State Teachers’ Retirement Plan administered by the State Teachers’ Retirement System with respect to the Defined Benefit Program are insufficient to meet the obligations of that program already accrued or projected to be accrued in the future with respect to service credited to members of that program before July 1, 2014.

(b) Various legal rulings have determined that vested contractual rights of existing members generally cannot be changed without providing a comparable new advantage.

(c) The improvement factor currently provided
 under the Defined Benefit Program pursuant to Sections 22140 and 22141, as those sections read before July 1, 2014, is not a contractually enforceable promise.

(d) The Legislature hereby increases the contributions of active members by an amount not to exceed the normal cost of the improvement factor, providing a comparable new advantage by removing the statutory right to adjust the improvement factor, and thereby establishing the improvement factor as a contractually enforceable promise.

(e) The statutory changes adopted by the act that added this section address the long-term funding needs of the Defined Benefit Program in a manner that allocates increased contributions among members of the system and school employers, consistent with the contractual rights of existing members.

(f) The provisions of the act that
 added this section were based on various legal understandings and would not have been adopted without those understandings. The new obligations and benefits provided in Sections 7 and 9 of the act adding this section are contingent on those legal understandings being accurate. Thus if there is a final unappealable judicial decision that holds that the increased contributions in Section 22950.5 constitute a new functional responsibility for schools and community colleges pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 41204, and correspondingly require an adjustment pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, or a final unappealable administrative or judicial decision that holds that the increased contributions in Section 22950.5 constitutes a reimbursable mandate pursuant to Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, then it is the intent of the Legislature that the provisions added by the act adding this section shall cease to be effective.

(g) It is in the public interest and a matter of urgency to authorize, and to implement as soon as possible, a remedy to the funding problem of the system. This remedy is necessary to ensure that funds will be available to support a pension system upon which hundreds of thousands of teachers rely and for which the current funding structure raises significant fiscal policy concerns.

(h) It is of great importance to the state, the system, and school districts that there not be long term doubt about the feasibility of the solutions provided in the act that added this section. In order to fulfill the important objective of facilitating the system’s and school districts’ financial transactions the legality of the act that added this section must be quickly affirmed. The system, school districts, and teachers need to settle promptly all questions about the validity of each other’s duties
 and obligations under this statute.

(i) It is well-established that the terms and conditions of public retirement plans generally are established by statute or other comparable enactment rather than by contract. Statutes governing the terms of compensation and deferred compensation of public employees are thus significant financial obligations contemplated and covered by Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 47, Sec. 1.   (AB 1469)   Effective June 24, 2014.   Adding action may become inoperative under conditions prescribed by Stats. 2014, Ch. 47, Sec. 13, subd. (b).)
-------------------------------------------

22003.

The revision of the State Teachers’ Retirement Law, enacted at the 1971 and 1972 Regular Sessions of the Legislature, shall not be construed to affect benefits of persons retired prior to July 1, 1972, or their beneficiaries, except as specifically provided.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22004.

If the provisions of this part are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if the provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22005.

The right of a person to a pension, retirement allowance, return of contributions, any optional benefit, or any other right accrued or accruing to any person under this part is exempt from taxation, including any inheritance tax, whether state, county, municipal, or district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22006.

The right of a person to an annuity or a retirement allowance, to the return of contributions, the annuity, or retirement allowance itself, any optional benefit, any other right or benefit accrued or accruing to any person under this part, and the moneys in the fund created under this part are not subject to execution or any other process whatsoever, except to the extent permitted by Section 704.110 of the Code of Civil Procedure, and are unassignable except as specifically provided in this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 634, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

22007.

The obligations of any member, or the member’s beneficiaries, to this system and the Defined Benefit Program continue throughout membership, and thereafter until all of the obligations of this system and the Defined Benefit Program to or in respect to the member or the member’s beneficiaries have been discharged.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 939, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

22007.5.

Except as excluded by subdivision (d) of Sections 22661 and 23812, subdivision (e) of Section 24300.1, subdivision (d) of Section 25011.1, subdivision (c) of Section 25018.1, subdivision (d) of Section 26807.5, and subdivision (c) of Section 26906.5, a person who is the registered domestic partner of a member, as established pursuant to Section 297 or 299.2 of the Family Code, shall be treated in the same manner as a “spouse,” as defined in Section 22171.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 558, Sec. 1.   (AB 1379)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

22008.

For the purposes of payments into or out of the retirement fund for adjustments of errors or omissions with respect to the Defined Benefit Program or the Defined Benefit Supplement Program, the period of limitation of actions shall be applied, except as provided in Sections 23302 and 24613, as follows:

(a) No action may be commenced by or against the board, the system, or the plan more than three years after all obligations to or on behalf of the member, former member, beneficiary, or annuity beneficiary have been discharged.

(b) If the system makes an error that results in incorrect payment to a member, former member, beneficiary, or annuity beneficiary, the system’s right to commence recovery shall expire three years from the date the incorrect payment was made.

(c) If an incorrect payment is made due to lack of information or inaccurate information regarding the eligibility of a member, former member, beneficiary, or annuity beneficiary to receive benefits under the Defined Benefit Program or Defined Benefit Supplement Program, the period of limitation shall commence with the discovery of the incorrect payment.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, if an incorrect payment has been made on the basis of fraud or intentional misrepresentation by a member, beneficiary, annuity beneficiary, or other party in relation to or on behalf of a member, beneficiary, or annuity beneficiary, the three-year period of limitation shall not be deemed to commence or to have commenced until the system discovers the incorrect payment.

(e) The collection of overpayments under subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) shall be made pursuant to Section 24617.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 74, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22009.

If any provision of this part or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this part that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this part are severable.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22010.

(a) It is unlawful for a person to do any of the following:

(1) Make, or cause to be made, any knowingly false material statement or material representation, to knowingly fail to disclose a material fact, or to otherwise provide false information with the intent to use it, or allow it to be used, to obtain, receive, continue, increase, deny, or reduce any benefit administered by this system.

(2) Present, or cause to be presented, any knowingly false material statement or material representation for the purpose of supporting or opposing an application for any benefit administered by this system.

(3) Knowingly accept or obtain payment from this system with knowledge that the recipient is not entitled to the payment under the provisions of this part or Part 14 (commencing with Section 2600) and with the intent to retain the payment for personal use or benefit.

(4) Knowingly aid, abet, solicit, or conspire with any person to do an act prohibited by this section.

(b) For purposes of this section, “statement” includes, but is not limited to, any oral or written application for benefits, report of family relationship, report of injury or physical or mental limitation, hospital records, test results, physician reports, or other medical records, employment records, duty statements, reports of compensation, or any other evidence material to the determination of a person’s initial or continued eligibility for a benefit or the amount of a benefit administered by this system.

(c) A person who violates any provision of this section is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year, or by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(d) A person violating any provision of this section may be required by the court in a criminal action to make restitution to this system, or to any other person determined by the court, for the amount of the benefit unlawfully obtained, unless the court finds that restitution, or a portion of it, is not in the interests of justice. Any restitution order imposed pursuant to this section shall be satisfied before any criminal fine imposed under this section may be collected.

(e) The provisions provided by this section are cumulative and shall not be construed as restricting the application of any other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 369, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

22011.

For an application or document requiring a signature, that signature shall be in a form prescribed by the system, including, but not limited to, on paper or made by electronic means. Notwithstanding any other law, an application or document made under this part, Part 13.5 (commencing with Section 25900), or Part 14 (commencing with Section 26000) that is signed and submitted by the person authorized to do so using technology and security measures prescribed by the system shall be deemed to be a signed and valid original document.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 186, Sec. 1.   (SB 634)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Definitions [22100. - 22177.]

22100.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this chapter govern the construction of this part.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 933, Sec. 3.   Effective September 28, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22101.

“Accumulated annuity deposit contributions” means the sum of all the annuity deposits standing to the credit of the member’s account, together with credited interest.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 933, Sec. 3.   Effective September 28, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22101.5.

“Accumulated Defined Benefit Supplement account balance” means the amount of credits equal to the sum of member contributions, the member contributions picked up by an employer, employer contributions, interest credited pursuant to Section 25005 and additional earnings credited pursuant to Section 25006.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1021, Sec. 1) by Stats. 2016, Ch. 218, Sec. 2.   (SB 1352)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

22102.

“Accumulated retirement contributions” means the sum of the member contributions, the member contributions picked up by an employer pursuant to Sections 22903 and 22904, and credited interest on those contributions. Accumulated retirement contributions shall not include accumulated annuity deposit contributions, accumulated tax-sheltered annuity contributions, accumulated Defined Benefit Supplement account balance, or additional earnings credit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1021, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22103.

“Accumulated tax-sheltered annuity contributions” means the tax-sheltered contributions made by a member and standing to the credit of the member’s account, together with credited interest.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 933, Sec. 3.   Effective September 28, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22104.

“Actuarial equivalent” means an allowance of equal value when computed upon the basis of such tables and interest rates that are adopted by the board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 933, Sec. 3.   Effective September 28, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22104.5.

“Actuary” means a person professionally trained in the technical and mathematical aspects of insurance, pensions, and related fields who has been appointed by the board for the purpose of actuarial services required under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 939, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

22104.7.

“Additional earnings credit” means an amount derived from investment income for the plan year as determined by the board by plan amendment and added to members’ Defined Benefit Supplement accounts in addition to the amount credited at the minimum interest rate for that plan year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 74, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22104.8.

(a) “Annualized pay rate” means the salary or wages, as described in Section 22119.2 or 22119.3, a person could earn during a school term for an assignment if creditable service were performed for that assignment on a full-time basis.

(b) If creditable service is not performed on a full-time basis because a member is performing those activities pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 22119.5, the annualized pay rate shall be determined as if the salary or wages have been earned at the lowest annualized pay rate of other creditable service activities performed by the member for the same employer during the same school year.

(c) (1) The board shall determine a date based on when the system has the capacity to implement the changes made by the act that added this subdivision. The date determined by the board shall be posted on the internet website of the system no later than July 1, 2027.

(2) This section shall become inoperative on the date determined by the board pursuant to paragraph (1), and this section shall be repealed on July 1, 2027.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 690, Sec. 1.   (AB 1997)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed as of July 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 1 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 239.)
-------------------------------------------

22104.8.

(a) “Annualized pay rate” means the salary, as described in Section 22119.3, a person could earn during a school term in each position subject to membership if creditable service were performed for that position on a full-time basis.

(b) The annualized pay rate shall be determined pursuant to the publicly available pay schedule by using either of the following methods:

(1) Explicitly itemized as a single amount, either separately or within a table.

(2) Derived from an explicit hourly or daily rate multiplied by the total hours or days required in order to be
 employed in the position subject to membership on a full-time basis pursuant to Section 22138.5. If the total hours or days required to be employed on a full-time basis is not established, the number of hours or days shall be the minimum standard described in Section 22138.5.

(c) If no annualized pay rate exists pursuant to subdivision (b) for a position subject to membership, all compensation earned in that position shall be deemed “supplemental pay” pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 22119.3.

(d) This definition of “annualized pay rate” is consistent with subdivision (e) of Section 22115.

(e) (1) The board shall determine a date based on when the system has the capacity to
 implement the changes made by the act that added this subdivision. The date determined by the board shall be posted on the internet website of the system no later than July 1, 2027.

(2) This section shall become operative on the date determined by the board pursuant to paragraph (1).

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 690, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 239, Sec. 1.   (SB 853)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22104.9.

“Annuitant Reserve” means a segregated account within the retirement fund established and maintained for expenditure on annuities payable under the Defined Benefit Supplement Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 74, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22105.

(a) “Annuity,” with respect to the Defined Benefit Program, means payments for life derived from the “accumulated annuity deposit contributions” of a member.

(b) “Annuity,” with respect to the Defined Benefit Supplement Program, means an alternative payment arrangement wherein a benefit based on the balance of credits in a member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account is paid monthly rather than in a lump-sum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 74, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22105.5.

“Annuity beneficiary” means the person or trust designated by a member pursuant to Section 25011, 25011.1, 25018, or 25018.1 to receive an annuity under the Defined Benefit Supplement Program upon the member’s death.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 559, Sec. 1.   (AB 1875)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

22106.

“Annuity deposit contributions” means additional contributions made by a member prior to July 1, 1972, above those required for credited service for the purpose of providing additional retirement income.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1025, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22106.1.

For the purposes of determining supplemental benefits pursuant to Sections 24412 and 24415, except as provided under Section 24410, “base allowance” means a monthly allowance under the Defined Benefit Program prior to all allowance increases by this part and after modification for an option, if applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 218, Sec. 3.   (SB 1352)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

22106.2.

“Base days” means the number of days of creditable service the employer requires the member’s class of employees to perform in a school year during the member’s most recent year of creditable service to earn one year of service credit. Base days shall not include school and legal holidays and shall not be less than the minimum standard specified in Section 22138.5. For those standards identified in Section 22138.5 that are expressed only in terms of hours, the number of hours shall be divided by six to determine the number of base days. The number of base days shall not be less than 175.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 275, Sec. 1.   (AB 2101)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

22106.3.

“Base hours” means the number of hours of creditable service required to earn one year of service credit.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 22106.2 by Stats. 2014, Ch. 755, Sec. 3.   (SB 1220)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

22106.5.

“Basis of employment” means the standard of time over which the employer expects service to be performed by an employee in the position during the school term.

(a) “Full-time basis” means a basis of employment that is full time.

(b) “Part-time basis” means a basis of employment that is less than full time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 416, Sec. 1.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

22107.

(a) “Beneficiary,” with respect to the Defined Benefit Program, means any person or entity receiving or entitled to receive an allowance or lump-sum payment under the Defined Benefit Program because of the disability or death of a member.

(b) “Beneficiary,” with respect to the Defined Benefit Supplement Program, means any person or entity receiving or entitled to receive a final benefit under the Defined Benefit Supplement Program upon the death of a member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 74, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22108.

(a) “Benefit” or “benefits,” with respect to the Defined Benefit Program, means any monthly payment due a retired member, disabled member, or beneficiary, and includes lump-sum payments due on account of death.

(b) “Benefit” and “benefits,” with respect to the Defined Benefit Supplement Program, means an amount equal to the balance of credits in a member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 74, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22109.

“Board” means the Teachers’ Retirement Board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 933, Sec. 3.   Effective September 28, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22109.8.

“California Public Employees’ Pension Reform Act of 2013” means the California Public Employees’ Pension Reform Act of 2013 (Article 4 (commencing with Section 7522) of Chapter 21 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 559, Sec. 2.   (AB 1381)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Deemed operative January 1, 2013, by Sec. 1 of Ch. 559.)
-------------------------------------------

22110.

“California service” means service performed in California for which credit may be given.
